North Dakota, session 69, HB1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 26.1-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Health insurance benefits coverage - Insulin drug and supply out - of-pocket limitations .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as in section 26.1 - 36.3 - 01 .
b. "Insulin drug" means a prescription drug that contains insulin and is used to treat a form
of diabetes mellitus. The term does not include an insulin pump, an electronic insulin-
administering smart pen, or a continuous glucose monitor, or supplies needed specifically
for the use of such electronic devices. The term includes insulin in the following
categories:
(1) Rapid-acting insulin;
(2) Short-acting insulin;
(3) Intermediate-acting insulin;
(4) Long-acting insulin;
(5) Premixed insulin product;
(6) Premixed insulin/GLP - 1 RA product; and
(7) Concentrated human regular insulin.
c. "Medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration" means supplies needed for
proper insulin dosing, as well as supplies needed to detect or address medical
emergencies in an individual using insulin to manage diabetes mellitus. The term does
not include an insulin pump, an electronic insulin-administering smart pen, or a
continuous glucose monitor, or supplies needed specifically for the use of such electronic
devices. The term includes:
(1) Blood glucose meters;
(2) Blood glucose test strips;
(3) Lancing devices and lancets;
(4) Ketone testing supplies, such as urine strips, blood ketone meters, and blood
ketone strips;

H. B. NO. 1114 - PAGE 2
(5) Glucagon, in injectable and nasal forms;
(6) Insulin pen needles; and
(7) Insulin syringes.
d. "Pharmacy or distributor" means a pharmacy or medical supply company, or other
medication or medical supply distributor filling a prescription.
2. An insurance company, nonprofit health service corporation, or health maintenance
organization may not deliver, issue, execute, or renew any health benefit plan unless the
health benefit plan provides benefits for insulin drug and medical supplies for insulin dosing
and administration which complies with this section.
3. The health benefit plan must limit ou t - of-pocket costs for a thirty - day supply of :
a. Covered insulin drugs, which may not exceed twenty-five dollars per pharmacy or
distributor, regardless of the quantity or type of insulin drug used to fill the covered
individual's prescription needs.
b. Covered medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration, the total of which may
not exceed twenty-five dollars per pharmacy or distributor, regardless of the quantity or
manufacturer of supplies used to fill the covered individual's prescription needs.
4. The health benefit plan may not allow a pharmacy benefits manager or the pharmacy or
distributor to charge a covered individual, require the pharmacy or distributor to collect from a
covered individual, or require a covered individual to make a payment for a covered insulin
drug or medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration in an amount exceeding the
ou t - of-pocket limits under subsection 3 .
5. The health benefit plan may not impose a deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or other cost-
sharing requirement that causes ou t - of-pocket costs for prescribed insulin or medical supplies
for insulin dosing and administration to exceed the amount under subsection 3 .
6. Subsection 3 does not require the health benefit plan to implement a particular cost-sharing
structure and does not prevent the limitation of ou t - of-pocket costs to less than the amoun t
specified under subsection 3. This section does not limit whether the health benefit plan
classifies an insulin pump, an electronic insulin-administering smart pen, or a continuous
glucose monitor as a drug or as a medical device or supply.
7. If application of subsection 3 would result in the ineligibility of a health benefit plan that is a
qualified high-deductible health plan to qualify as a health savings account under section 223
of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 223], the requirements of subsection 3 do not apply
with respect to the deductible of the health benefit plan until after the enrollee has met the
minimum deductible under section 26 U.S.C. 223.
8. This section does not apply to the Medicare par t D prescription drug coverage plan .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.1-04.18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-52.1-04.18. Health insurance benefits coverage - Insulin drug and supply out-of-pocket
limitations. (Expired effective July 31, 2025)
1. As used in this section:
a. "Insulin drug" means a prescription drug that contains insulin and is used to treat a form
of diabetes mellitus. The term does not include an insulin pump, an electronic insulin-
administering smart pen, or a continuous glucose monitor, or supplies needed specifically

H. B. NO. 1114 - PAGE 3
for the use of such electronic devices. The term includes insulin in the following
categories:
(1) Rapid-acting insulin;
(2) Short-acting insulin;
(3) Intermediate-acting insulin;
(4) Long-acting insulin;
(5) Premixed insulin product;
(6) Premixed insulin/GLP-1 RA product; and
(7) Concentrated human regular insulin.
b. "Medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration" means supplies needed for
proper insulin dosing, as well as supplies needed to detect or address medical
emergencies in an individual using insulin to manage diabetes mellitus. The term does
not include an insulin pump, an electronic insulin-administering smart pen, or a
continuous glucose monitor, or supplies needed specifically for the use of such electronic
devices. The term includes:
(1) Blood glucose meters;
(2) Blood glucose test strips;
(3) Lancing devices and lancets;
(4) Ketone testing supplies, such as urine strips, blood ketone meters, and blood
ketone strips;
(5) Glucagon, in injectable and nasal forms;
(6) Insulin pen needles; and
(7) Insulin syringes.
c. "Pharmacy or distributor" means a pharmacy or medical supply company, or other
medication or medical supply distributor filling a covered individual's prescriptions.
2. The board shall provide health insurance benefits coverage that provides for insulin drug and
medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration which complies with this sectionas provided
under section 1 of this Ac t.
3. The coverage must limit out-of-pocket costs for a thirty-day supply of:
a. Covered insulin drugs which may not exceed twenty-five dollars per pharmacy or
distributor, regardless of the quantity or type of insulin drug used to fill the covered
individual's prescription needs.
b. Covered medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration, the total of which may
not exceed twenty-five dollars per pharmacy or distributor, regardless of the quantity or
manufacturer of supplies used to fill the covered individual's prescription needs.
4. The coverage may not allow a pharmacy benefits manager or the pharmacy or distributor to
charge, require the pharmacy or distributor to collect, or require a covered individual to make a
payment for a covered insulin drug or medical supplies for insulin dosing and administration in
an amount that exceeds the out-of-pocket limits set forth under subsection 3.

H. B. NO. 1114 - PAGE 4
5. The coverage may not impose a deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or other cost-sharing
requirement that causes out-of-pocket costs for prescribed insulin or medical supplies for
insulin dosing and administration to exceed the amount set forth under subsection 3.
6. Subsection 3 does not require the coverage to implement a particular cost-sharing structure
and does not prevent the limitation of out-of-pocket costs to less than the amount specified
under subsection 3. Subsection 3 does not limit out-of-pocket costs on an insulin pump, an
electronic insulin-administering smart pen, or a continuous glucose monitor. This section does
not limit whether coverage classifies an insulin pump, an electronic insulin-administering smart
pen, or a continuous glucose monitor as a drug or as a medical device or supply.
7. If application of subsection 3 would result in the ineligibility of a health benefit plan that is a
qualified high-deductible health plan to qualify as a health savings account under section 223
of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 223], the requirements of subsection 3 do not apply
with respect to the deductible of the health benefit plan until after the enrollee has satisfied the
minimum deductible under section 26 U.S.C. 223.
8. This section does not apply to the Medicare part D prescription drug coverage plan.

H. B. NO. 1114 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1114.
House Vote: Yeas 59 Nays 27 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 7 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State